ko: 강모 모양: 각진; 플랫; 둥근; 테이퍼드; 기타
th: รูปร่างขนแปรง: ทำมุม; ราบ; โค้งมน; ตัดเฉียง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblika ščetin: Pod kotom; Ravno; Zaokrožene; Stožčaste; Drugo
hr-HR: Oblik iglica: Pod kutom; Ravne; Zaobljene; Konusni; Ostalo
de: Borstenform: Abgewinkelt; Flach; Gerundet; Tapered; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 刷毛形状: 有角度的; 扁平的; 圆形; 锥形; 其他
ja: 毛の形: アングルド; フラット; ラウンド; テーパード; その他
hu: Sörte alakja: Szögletes; Lapos; Lekerekített; Kúpos; Egyéb
nl: Borstelvorm: Hoekig; Vlak; Afgerond; Taps toelopend; Andere
pl: Kształt włosia: Kątowe; Płaski; Zakrąglony; Zwężane; Inne
es: Forma de la cerda: Angular; Puro; Redondeado; Cónico; Otros
vi: Kiểu dáng lông: Có góc; Phẳng; Tròn trịa; Vót nhọn; Khác
cs: Tvar štětin: Úhlový; Plochý; Zaoblený; Tapered; Jiné
it: Forma delle setole: Angolata; Piatto; Arrotondata; Affusolata; Altro
pt-PT: Formato das cerdas: Angular; Plano; Arredondado; Afunilado; Outro
lt-LT: Šerių forma: Kampiniai; Plokšti; Apvalūs; Smailėjantys; Kita
bg-BG: Форма на косъма: Под ъгъл; Плоска; Заоблена; Конусовидна; Други
tr: Kıl şekli: Açılı; Düz; Yuvarlak; Konik; Diğer
zh-TW: 刷具形狀: 有角度; 平坦; 圓形; 楔型; 其他
el: Σχήμα τριχών: Υπό γωνία; Επίπεδη; Στρογγυλεμένη; Κωνική; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formă peri: Cu capăt conic; Flat; Rotunjită; Conică; Altele
en: Bristle shape: Angled; Flat; Rounded; Tapered; Other
fi: Harjaksen muoto: Kulmikas; Tasainen; Pyöristetty; Kapeneva; Muu
ru: Форма кисти: Угловой; Плоский; Круглый; Конический; Другой
nb: Bustform: Vinklet; Flat; Avrundet; Avsmalnet; Annet
fr: Forme des poils: Inclinée; Plate; Arrondi; Directionnel marqué; Autre
da: Børstehårform: Vinklet; Flad; Afrundet; Tilspidset; Andet
sv: Borstform: Vinklad; Platt; Avrundad; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
pt-BR: Formato das cerdas: Angular; Plana; Arredondado; Cônica; Outro
sk-SK: Tvar štetín: Uhlové; Plochý; Zaoblený; Zúžený; Iné